Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 183.333 is amended to read:
183.333. (1)(a) The Legislative Assembly finds and declares that it is the  policy of this state that
whenever possible the public  be involved in the development of public policy by agencies and in the
drafting of rules. The Legislative Assembly encourages agencies to seek public input to the maxi-
mum extent possible before giving notice of intent to adopt a rule.  The agency may appoint an ad-
visory committee or use any other means of obtaining public views that will assist the  agency in
drafting the rule.
(b) The membership of an advisory committee appointed under this subsection must represent
the interests of persons and communities likely to be affected by the rule.
(c) An agency that appoints an advisory committee under this subsection with regard to
adoption of rules implementing legislation enacted by  the Legislative Assembly shall invite
to participate as a nonvoting member of the committee:
(A) For legislation sponsored by a member of the Legislative Assembly, the first chief
sponsor of the legislation, or another sponsor of the legislation  as designated by the first
chief sponsor.
(B) For legislation sponsored by a committee of the  Legislative Assembly, the chair of
the committee that sponsored the legislation at  the time the legislation was introduced, or
another member of the committee as designated by the chair.
(2) Any agency in its discretion may develop a list of interested parties  and inform those parties
of any issue that may be the subject of rulemaking and invite the  parties to make comments on the
issue.
(3) If an agency appoints an advisory  committee for consideration of a rule under subsection (1)
of this section, the  agency shall seek the committee’s recommendations on whether the rule will
have a fiscal impact, what the extent of that impact will be and whether  the rule will have a sig-
nificant adverse  impact on small businesses. If the committee indicates that the rule will have a
significant adverse impact on small businesses,  the agency shall seek the committee’s recommenda-
tions on compliance with ORS 183.540.
(4) An agency shall consider an  advisory committee’s recommendations provided under sub-
section (3) of this section in preparing the statement of fiscal  impact required by ORS 183.335
(2)(b)(E).
Enrolled House Bill 3569 (HB 3569-A) Page 1
(5) If an agency does not appoint an advisory committee for consideration of  a permanent rule
under subsection (1) of this section and 10 or  more persons likely to be affected by the rule object
to the agency’s statement of fiscal impact as required by ORS 183.335 (2)(b)(E) or an association with
at least 10 members likely to be affected by  the rule objects to the statement, the agency shall ap-
point a fiscal impact advisory committee to  provide recommendations on whether the rule will have
a fiscal impact and what the extent of that impact will be. The membership of the fiscal impact ad-
visory committee must represent the interests of  persons and communities likely to be affected by
the rule. An objection under this subsection must be made not later  than 14 days after the notice
required by ORS 183.335 (1) is given. If the agency determines  that the statement does not ade-
quately reflect the rule’s fiscal impact, the agency shall extend the  period for submission of data or
views under ORS 183.335 (3)(a) by at least  20 days. The agency shall include any recommendations
from the committee in the record maintained by the agency for the rule.
(6) An agency may appoint the Small Business Rules  Advisory Committee established in ORS
183.407 as the advisory committee or fiscal impact advisory committee for purposes of this section.
(7) Subsection (5) of this section does not  apply to any rule adopted by an agency to comply
with a judgment or a settlement of a judicial proceeding.
(8) If  an agency is required by law to appoint an advisory committee or a fiscal impact advisory
committee under this section, the agency may not appoint an officer, employee or other agent  of the
agency to serve as a member of the advisory committee or fiscal impact advisory committee.
SECTION 2.
 ORS 183.407 is amended to read:
183.407. (1) The Small Business Rules Advisory Committee is established to serve  as an advisory
committee for agencies adopting new administrative rules and to  review the effectiveness of existing
administrative rules.
(2) The committee consists of nine members as follows:
(a) Two representatives of small businesses appointed by the Governor;
(b) Two representatives of small businesses appointed by the President of the Senate;
(c) Two representatives of small businesses appointed by the Speaker of the House;
(d) A representative of small businesses  appointed by the Office of Small Business Assistance
established in ORS 56.203;
(e) A representative of  state agencies appointed by the Director of the Oregon Department of
Administrative Services; and
(f) A member who is an expert in the rulemaking process appointed by the State Archivist.
(3)(a) Upon request of an agency, the committee shall  serve as the advisory committee or fiscal
impact advisory committee for  reviewing an agency’s proposed administrative rules under ORS
183.333.
(b) When an agency uses the committee as the advisory  committee under this subsection
with regard to adoption of rules  implementing legislation enacted by the Legislative Assem-
bly, the committee shall invite to participate as a nonvoting member of the committee:
(A) For legislation sponsored by a member of the Legislative Assembly, the first chief
sponsor of the legislation, or another sponsor of the legislation  as designated by the first
chief sponsor.
(B) For legislation sponsored by a committee of the  Legislative Assembly, the chair of
the committee that sponsored the legislation at  the time the legislation was introduced, or
another member of the committee as designated by the chair.
(4) Upon request of an agency, the committee  may agree to complete the rules review and re-
porting required by ORS 183.405 in place of the agency.
(5) Members of the committee shall be appointed to serve for terms  of two years, but a member
serves at the pleasure of the appointing authority.  The appointing authority shall appoint a person
to fill any vacancy on the committee for the expired term. A member may  be reappointed to the
committee.
Enrolled House Bill 3569 (HB 3569-A) Page 2
(6) The members of the committee shall elect a chairperson  from among the members of the
committee. In the absence of a chairperson, the member  appointed by the State Archivist shall serve
as acting chairperson.
(7) A majority of the members of the committee constitutes a quorum  for the transaction of
business.
(8) The  committee shall meet upon the call of the chairperson or upon a request of a majority
of the  members of the committee. The committee may meet by phone or video conference with at
least 24 hours’ public notice.
(9) The State Archives shall provide administrative support to the committee.
(10) Members of  the committee are not entitled to compensation, but may be reimbursed from
funds available to the State Archives  for actual and necessary travel and other expenses incurred
by them in the performance of their official duties in the manner and amounts provided for  in ORS
292.495.
SECTION 3.
(1) The amendments to ORS 183.333  by section 1 of this 2025 Act apply to
advisory committees appointed on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
(2) The amendments  to ORS 183.407 by section 2 of this 2025 Act apply to requests to use
the Small Business Rules Advisory Committee as the advisory  committee for reviewing an
agency’s proposed administrative rules made on or after the effective date of this 2025 Act.
Passed by House May 14, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 17, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3569 (HB 3569-A) Page 3